District of Columbia statutes.
47-921

Repealed

Severability; savings clause.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-92, § 702, 27 DCR 3390
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(s), 50 DCR 896
1981 Ed., § 47-921.
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(u) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
This section of D.C. Law 3-92 applies to all repealers or amendments affected by that law. Accordingly, this section must be read with other sections of D.C. Law 3-92 relating to recordation tax on deeds (§ 45-921 et seq.), residential real property transfer excise tax (§ 47-1401 et seq.), gross sales tax (§ 47-2001 et seq.), use tax (§ 47-2201 et seq.), personal property tax (§ 47-1507), and income tax (§ 47-1801.01 et seq.). The reader is advised to consult the disposition table in Volume 11 to determine specifically which sections outside this chapter were amended or repealed by D.C. Law 3-92.